eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 66    0       tarago/243      .
SFX 66    0       tatik      .
SFX 66    0       tatiko/243      .
SFX 66    0       tan      .
SFX 66    0       tarik      .
SFX 66    0       tariko/243      .
SFX 66    0       z      .
SFX 66    0       zko/243      .
SFX 66    0       rekin      .
SFX 66    0       rekiko/243      .
SFX 66    0       rendako/243      .
SFX 66    0       rentzat      .
SFX 66    0       rentzako/243      .
SFX 66    0       ren/238      .
SFX 66    0       rena      .
SFX 66    0       renak      .
SFX 66    0       renarekin      .
SFX 66    0       renarendako/243      .
SFX 66    0       renarentzat      .
SFX 66    0       renari      .
SFX 66    0       renaz      .
SFX 66    0       renei      .
SFX 66    0       renek      .
SFX 66    0       renekin      .
SFX 66    0       renendako/243      .
SFX 66    0       renentzat      .
SFX 66    0       renetaraino      .
SFX 66    0       renetarantz      .
SFX 66    0       renetarat      .
SFX 66    0       renetara      .
SFX 66    0       renetatik      .
SFX 66    0       renetan      .
SFX 66    0       renetarik      .
SFX 66    0       renez      .
SFX 66    0       rengan      .
SFX 66    0       rengana      .
SFX 66    0       renganaino      .
SFX 66    0       renganantz      .
SFX 66    0       rengandik      .
SFX 66    0       rengatik      .
SFX 66    0       renoi      .
SFX 66    0       renok      .
SFX 66    0       renokin      .
SFX 66    0       renontzat      .
SFX 66    0       renotaz      .
SFX 66    0       renoz      .
SFX 66    0       reni      .
SFX 66    0       renik      .
SFX 66    0       renean      .
SFX 66    0       reneraino      .
SFX 66    0       renerantz      .
SFX 66    0       renerat      .
SFX 66    0       renera      .
SFX 66    0       renetik      .
SFX 66    0       regatik      .
SFX 66    0       ri      .
SFX 66    0       rik      .
SFX 66    0       an      .
SFX 66    0       ko/243      .
SFX 66    0       koa      .
SFX 66    0       koago/243      .
SFX 66    0       koak      .
SFX 66    0       koarekin      .
SFX 66    0       koarendako/243      .
SFX 66    0       koarentzat      .
SFX 66    0       koari      .
SFX 66    0       koaz      .
SFX 66    0       koegi      .
SFX 66    0       koei      .
SFX 66    0       koek      .
SFX 66    0       koekin      .
SFX 66    0       koendako/243      .
SFX 66    0       koentzat      .
SFX 66    0       koetaraino      .
SFX 66    0       koetarantz      .
SFX 66    0       koetarat      .
SFX 66    0       koetara      .
SFX 66    0       koetatik      .
SFX 66    0       koetan      .
SFX 66    0       koetarik      .
SFX 66    0       koez      .
SFX 66    0       kogatik      .
SFX 66    0       kooi      .
SFX 66    0       kook      .
SFX 66    0       kookin      .
SFX 66    0       koontzat      .
SFX 66    0       kootaz      .
SFX 66    0       kooz      .
SFX 66    0       kotzat      .
SFX 66    0       kok      .
SFX 66    0       kotaraino      .
SFX 66    0       kotarantz      .
SFX 66    0       kotarat      .
SFX 66    0       kotara      .
SFX 66    0       kotatik      .
SFX 66    0       kotan      .
SFX 66    0       kotarik      .
SFX 66    0       koz      .
SFX 66    0       korekin      .
SFX 66    0       korendako/243      .
SFX 66    0       korentzat      .
SFX 66    0       kori      .
SFX 66    0       korik      .
SFX 66    0       koan      .
SFX 66    0       koraino      .
SFX 66    0       korantz      .
SFX 66    0       korat      .
SFX 66    0       kora      .
SFX 66    0       kotik      .
SFX 66    0       raino      .
SFX 66    0       rainoko/243      .
SFX 66    0       rantz      .
SFX 66    0       rantzago/243      .
SFX 66    0       rantzegi      .
SFX 66    0       ranzko/243      .
SFX 66    0       rat      .
SFX 66    0       rako/243      .
SFX 66    0       ra      .
SFX 66    0       rago/243      .
SFX 66    0       tik      .
SFX 66    0       tiko/243      .
